Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1022
Adoption of regulations; notice; hearing; appeal.

Notice of any hearing to be conducted by the department pursuant to section 31-1020 shall be given to the clerk of the local government and to such other local officials as the department deems appropriate, at least thirty days prior to the hearing. Notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area involved at least once each week for three consecutive weeks, the last publication of which shall be not less than five days prior to the date set for the hearing. The rules and regulations of the department adopted and promulgated in accordance with section 31-1020 shall not be subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act. Appeals from department determinations pursuant to section 31-1020 may be taken by any aggrieved party, and the appeals shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 22;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 28;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 83.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.